Maryland, session 2026, SB0441.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 11–1006.2 of Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis of the Annotated
Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 11–1006.3.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
11–102.
This title applies only in Anne Arundel County.
– 1 –

Ch. 851 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
11–1006.2.
(A) THERE IS A CLASS C GC (GOLF COURSE) LICENSE.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE FOR USE AT A GOLF COURSE WITH
AT LEAST NINE HOLES.
(C) THE LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSE HOLDER TO SELL BEER, WINE,
AND LIQUOR AT RETAIL AT THE PLACE DESCRIBED IN THE LICENSE FOR
ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION.
(D) THE BOARD MAY PLACE CONDITIONS ON THE LOCATION OF SALES AND
CONSUMPTION, INCLUDING PROHIBITING THE SALE AND CONSUMPTION OF BEER,
WINE, AND LIQUOR IN SPECIFIC AREAS OF THE PREMISES.
(E) (1) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE HOLDER OF THE LICENSE MAY SELL BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR ON
MONDAY THROUGH SUNDAY FROM 6 A.M. TO 2 A.M. THE FOLLOWING DAY.
(II) THE HOLDER OF THE LICENSE NEED NOT OBTAIN A SUNDAY
PERMIT UNDER § 11–2004 OF THIS TITLE TO SELL ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ON
SUNDAY.
(2) THE BOARD MAY REDUCE THE HOURS AND DAYS OF SALE FOR ALL
OR PART OF THE LICENSED PREMISES.
(F) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEE IS $1,200.
11–1008.2.
(A) THERE IS:
(1) A SPORTS ACTIVITY VENUE BEER AND WINE LICENSE; AND
(2) A SPORTS ACTIVITY VENUE BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE A LICENSE TO THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A
COMMERCIAL RECREATIONAL FACILITY THAT OFFERS:
(1) BOWLING;
(2) GOLF SIMULATORS;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 851
(3) MULTISPORT SIMULATORS;
(4) INDOOR OR OUTDOOR PICKLEBALL COURTS;
(5) INDOOR GYMNASIUMS OR TRAINING CENTERS; OR
(6) ANY SIMILAR SPORT ACTIVITY OR VENUE.
(C) (1) THE SPORTS ACTIVITY VENUE BEER AND WINE LICENSE
AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO SELL BEER AND WINE AT RETAIL AT THE PLACE
DESCRIBED IN THE LICENSE FOR ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION.
(2) THE SPORTS ACTIVITY VENUE BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE
AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO SELL BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR AT RETAIL AT THE
PLACE DESCRIBED IN THE LICENSE FOR ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION.
(D) (1) THE LICENSE HOLDER MAY SELL OR SERVE ALCOHOL ONLY IN
AREAS WITHIN THE PREMISES DESIGNATED FOR ACTIVITY, SEATING, BAR SERVICE,
AND DINING, INCLUDING PRIVATE PARTY ROOMS, AS DELINEATED IN THE LICENSE
APPLICATION AND SITE PLAN APPROVED BY THE BOARD.
(2) THE LICENSE AUTHORIZES SALES TO A CUSTOMER, AT LEAST 21
YEARS OLD, WHO IS:
(I) ACTIVELY UTILIZING OR PARTICIPATING IN THE VENUE’S
RECREATIONAL SERVICES OR DINING; OR
(II) ON THE LICENSED PREMISES AS A GUEST OF A PARTICIPANT
IN AN ACTIVITY OFFERED BY THE VENUE.
(E) THE LICENSE HOLDER SHALL MAINTAIN AND OFFER FOR SALE TO
CUSTOMERS A VARIETY OF PREPARED, CONSUMABLE FOOD ITEMS AVAILABLE
DURING ALL HOURS THAT ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ARE FOR SALE, AS APPROVED BY
THE BOARD BASED ON THE NATURE OF THE FACILITY.
(F) THE LICENSE HOLDER SHALL:
(1) REQUIRE ALL EMPLOYEES SERVING ALCOHOL TO BE CERTIFIED
BY AN APPROVED ALCOHOL AWARENESS TRAINING PROGRAM;
– 3 –

Ch. 851 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) IMPLEMENT A WRITTEN POLICY FOR EMPLOYEES TO MONITOR
AND LIMIT SERVICE TO CUSTOMERS WHO ARE ACTIVELY PARTICIPATING IN
PHYSICAL ACTIVITIES TO ENSURE SAFETY AND PREVENT INTOXICATION; AND
(3) OBTAIN A CROWD CONTROL TRAINING CERTIFICATE WHERE THE
OCCUPANT LOAD EXCEEDS 50 PERSONS.
(G) (1) THE LICENSE HOLDER MAY SELL ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
MONDAY THROUGH SUNDAY FROM 6 A.M. TO 2 A.M. THE FOLLOWING DAY.
(2) THE LICENSE HOLDER NEED NOT OBTAIN A SUNDAY LICENSE
UNDER § 11–2004 OF THIS TITLE TO SELL ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ON SUNDAY.
(H) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEES ARE:
(1) $740 FOR A SPORTS ACTIVITY VENUE BEER AND WINE LICENSE;
AND
(2) $1,200 FOR A SPORTS ACTIVITY VENUE BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR
LICENSE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 4 –